Vermont, session 2025-2026, S152.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 632 is amended to read:
§ 632. EXAMINATION REQUIRED; WAIVER
(a) Before an operator’s or a junior operator’s license is issued to an
applicant for the first time in this State, or before a renewal license is issued to
an applicant whose previous Vermont license had expired more than three
years prior to the application for renewal, the applicant shall pass a satisfactory
examination, except that the Commissioner may, in his or her the
Commissioner’s discretion, waive the examination when the applicant holds a
VT LEG #379165 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.152
2025 Page 2 of 2
chauffeur’s or operator’s license in force at the time of application or within
three years prior to the application in some other jurisdiction where an
examination is required similar to the examination required in this State.
(b) The examination shall consist of:
(1) an oral or written examination;
(2) a thorough road test; and
(3) at the discretion of the Commissioner, such other examination or
demonstration as he or she the Commissioner may prescribe, including an oral
eye examination.
(c) An applicant may have an individual of his or her the applicant’s
choosing at the oral examination or road test to serve as an interpreter,
including to translate any oral commands given as part of the road test.
(d) Before a renewal license is issued to an applicant 80 years of age or
older, the applicant must appear in person at a Department location and pass a
vision test.
(e) Before a renewal license is issued to an applicant 85 years of age or
older, the applicant must pass the road test component of the examination.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379165 v.1